Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.560

Motor vehicle transportation service—Definitions.

As used in RCW 43.19.565 through 43.19.635, * 43.41.130 and * 43.41.140, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) "Passenger motor vehicle" means any sedan, station wagon, bus, or light truck which is designed for carrying ten passengers or less and is used primarily for the transportation of persons;

(2) "State agency" shall include any state office, agency, commission, department, or institution financed in whole or in part from funds appropriated by the legislature. It shall also include the Washington state school directors' association, but it shall not include (a) the state supreme court or any agency of the judicial branch or (b) the legislature or any of its statutory, standing, special, or interim committees, other than at the option of the judicial or legislative agency or committee concerned;

(3) "Employee commuting" shall mean travel by a state officer or employee to or from his or her official residence or other domicile to or from his or her official duty station or other place of work;

(4) "Motor vehicle transportation services" shall include but not be limited to the furnishing of motor vehicles for the transportation of persons or property, with or without drivers, and may also include furnishing of maintenance, storage, and other support services to state agencies for the conduct of official state business.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 230; 1983 c 187 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41.130 and 43.41.140 were recodified as RCW 43.19.622 and 43.19.623, respectively, pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 325.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1983 c 187: See RCW 28A.345.902.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this 1975 amendatory act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 20.]

Power to appoint or employ personnel does not include power to provide state owned or leased vehicle: RCW 43.01.150.